Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1138
Disabilities; assessment, identification, and verification of need for services; Commissioner of Education; duties.

(1) The State Board of Education shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing criteria for the assessment, identification, and verification of all disabilities defined in section 79-1118.01 to the extent that such disabilities are consistent with federal law and regulation.

(2) The Commissioner of Education shall develop guidelines to assist school districts, educational service units, and approved cooperatives with the assessment, identification, and verification of the need for related services defined in section 79-1121.

Laws 1986, LB 942, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1986, § 43-605.01;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3317;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 820;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 28;

Laws 1997, LB 865, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 41;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 30.